Utah statutes.
78B-14-206 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Enforcement and modification of support order by tribunal having continuing jurisdiction.

(1)  A tribunal of this state that has issued a child-support order consistent with the law of this state may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce:

(a)  the order if the order is the controlling order and has not been modified by a tribunal of another state that assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act; or

(b)  a money judgment for arrears of support and interest on the order accrued before a determination that an order of another state is the controlling order.

(2)  A tribunal of this state having continuing jurisdiction over a support order may act as a responding tribunal to enforce the order.

